California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.23.

In order to assess overlapping or duplicate health coverage, every health insurer, self-insured plan, group health plan, as defined in Section 607(1) of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.), service benefit plan, managed care organization, including a health care service plan as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service shall maintain a centralized file of the subscribers’, policyholders’, or enrollees’ names, mailing addresses, and social
 security numbers or dates of birth, and where available, for all other covered persons, the names and social security numbers or dates of birth. This information shall be made available to the department or a regional center upon reasonable request. Notwithstanding Section 20230 of the Government Code, the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and affiliated systems or contract agencies shall permit data matches with the state department to identify consumers with third-party health coverage or insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 199.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4659.24.

(a) When the rights of a consumer or a child receiving services under the California Early Intervention Program to recovery from an insurer have been assigned to the department or a regional center, an insurer shall not impose any requirement on the department or the regional center that is different from any requirement applicable to an agent or assignee of the covered consumer or child.

(b) The department may garnish the wages, salary, or other employment income of, and withhold amounts from state tax refunds from, any person to whom both of the following apply:

(1) The person is required by a court or administrative order to provide
 coverage of the costs of services provided to a child under the California Early Intervention Program or a consumer under this division.

(2) The person has received payment from a third party for the costs of the services for the child or consumer, but he or she has not used the payments to reimburse, as appropriate, either the other parent or the person having custody of the child or consumer, or the provider of the services, to the extent necessary to reimburse the department for expenditures for those costs under this division. All claims for current or past due child support shall take priority over claims made by the department or the regional center.

(c) For purposes of this section, “insurer” includes every health insurer, self-insured plan, group health plan, as defined in Section 607(1) of the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et
 seq.), service benefit plan, managed care organization, including health care service plans as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1345 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 9, Sec. 14.   (SB 74)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regional Center Board Meetings [4660. - 4669.]

4660.

All meetings of the board of directors of each regional center shall be scheduled, open, and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting, except as otherwise provided in this section. Regional center board meetings shall be held in accordance with all of the following provisions:

(a) Each regional center shall provide a copy of this article to each member of the regional center governing board upon his or her assumption of board membership.

(b) As used in this article, board meetings include meetings conducted by any committee of the governing board which exercises authority delegated to it by that governing board. However, board meetings shall not be deemed to include board retreats planned solely for educational purposes.

(c) At each regional center board meeting, time shall be allowed for public input on all properly noticed agenda items prior to board action on that item. Time shall be allowed for public input on any issue not included on the agenda.

(d) Any person attending an open and public meeting of a regional center shall have the right to record the proceedings on a tape recorder, video recorder, or other sound, visual, or written transcription recording device, in the absence of a reasonable finding of the regional center governing board that such recording constitutes, or would constitute, a disruption of the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 21.   Effective September 22, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4661.

(a) Regional centers shall mail notice of their meetings to any person who requests notice in writing. Notice shall be mailed at least seven days in advance of each meeting. The notice shall include the date, time, and location of, and a specific agenda for, the meeting, which shall include an identification of all substantive topic areas to be discussed, and no item shall be added to the agenda subsequent to the provision of this notice. The notice requirement shall not preclude the regional center board from taking action on any urgent request made by the department, not related to purchase of service reductions, for which the board makes a specific finding that notice could not have been provided at least seven days before the meeting, or on new items brought before the board at meetings by members of the public.

(b) The regional center shall maintain all recordings and written comments submitted as testimony on agenda items for no less than two years. These materials shall be made available for review by any person, upon request.

(c) Any action taken by a board that is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have substantially violated any provision of this article shall be deemed null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 22.   Effective September 22, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4662.

In the case of an emergency situation involving matters upon which prompt action is necessary due to the disruption or threatened disruption of regional center services, an emergency meeting may be called without complying with the advanced notice requirement of Section 4661. For the purposes of this article, “emergency situation” means any activity which severely impairs public health, safety, or both, as determined by a majority of the members of the regional center board. In these situations, advance notice shall be provided if practicable. In addition, the state council shall be notified by telephone of each emergency meeting. The minutes of an emergency meeting, including a description of any actions taken at the meeting, shall be mailed immediately to those
 persons described in Section 4661.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 50.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4663.

(a) The governing board of a regional center may hold a closed meeting to discuss or consider one or more of the following:

(1) Real estate negotiations.

(2) The appointment, employment, evaluation of performance, or dismissal of a regional center employee.

(3) Employee salaries and benefits.

(4) Labor contract negotiations.

(5) Pending litigation.

(b) Any matter specifically dealing with a particular regional center client must be conducted in a closed session, except where it is requested that the issue be discussed publicly by the client, the client’s conservator, or the client’s parent or guardian where the client is a minor. Minutes of closed sessions shall be kept by a designated officer or employee of the regional center, but these minutes shall not be considered public records. Prior to and directly after holding any closed session, the regional center board shall state the specific reason or reasons for the closed session. In the closed session, the board may consider only those matters covered in its statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4664.

The governing board of a regional center may hold a closed session regarding pending litigation when discussion in open session concerning those matters would prejudice the position of the regional center in the litigation. Litigation shall be considered pending when any of the following circumstances exist:

(a) An adjudicatory proceeding to which the regional center is a party has been initiated formally.

(b) A point has been reached where, based upon existing facts and circumstances and the advice of legal counsel, it is determined that there is a significant exposure to litigation against the regional center.

(c) Based on existing facts and circumstances, the regional center has decided to initiate or is deciding whether to initiate litigation.

Prior to holding a closed session pursuant to this section, the regional center governing board shall state publicly to which subdivision it is pursuant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 414, Sec. 23.   Effective September 22, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4665.

Agendas and other writings or materials distributed prior to or during a regional center board meeting for discussion or action at the meeting shall be considered public records, except those materials distributed during, and directly related to, a closed session authorized under Section 4663. Writings which are distributed prior to commencement of a board meeting shall be made available for public inspection upon request prior to commencement of the meeting. Writings which are distributed during a board meeting shall be made available for public inspection at the time of their discussion at the meeting. A reasonable fee may be charged for a copy of a public record distributed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4666.

No regional center shall conduct any meeting, conference, or other function in any facility that prohibits the admittance of any person, or persons, on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4667.

All regional center board meetings shall be held in facilities accessible to persons with physical disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4668.

(a) Any action taken by a regional center governing board in violation of this article is null and void. Any interested person may commence an action by mandamus, injunction, or declaratory relief for the purpose of obtaining a judicial declaration that an action taken in violation of this article is null and void.

(b) A court may award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this section where it is found that a regional center board has violated the provisions of this article.

(c) This section does not prevent a regional center governing board from curing or correcting an action challenged pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4669.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to the corporate affairs of the governing board of a regional center which have no relationship to the role and responsibility of a regional center set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regional Center Alternatives for Service Delivery [4669.2. - 4669.75.]

4669.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and provided that there shall be no reduction in direct service to persons eligible for services under this article, a regional center, with the approval of the State Department of Developmental Services, and in consultation with the state council, consumer and vendor advisory committees, and local advocacy organizations, may explore and implement any regional center service delivery alternative included in this section for consumers living in the community, as follows:

(1) Alternative service coordination for consumers.

(2) Technical and financial support to consumers, and where
 appropriate, their families, to provide or secure their own services in lieu of services that regional centers would otherwise provide, purchase, or secure. These programs shall be cost-effective in the aggregate, and shall be limited to consumers who are at imminent risk of moving to a more restrictive setting.

(3) Procedures whereby regional centers may negotiate levels of payment with providers for delivery of specific services to a group of consumers through a mutually agreed upon contract with a specific term and a guaranteed reimbursement amount. Contracted services may be for any specific service or combination of services across vendor categories.

(4) Procedures whereby consumers, regional center representatives, the state council, and local service providers may jointly examine and make recommendations to the department for reduced reporting and recording requirements of
 regional centers. The recommendations shall be made available upon request.

(5) Proposals to reduce reporting and recordkeeping requirements at a regional center.

(6) Procedures whereby a regional center may lease a facility and contract for the provision of services in that facility for regional center clients.

(7) Procedures that encourage innovative approaches to the sharing of administrative resources between regional centers and other public and private agencies serving persons with developmental disabilities.

(8) Proposals for a regional center to purchase a facility for its own office space if it can be shown to be cost-effective. Funds from a regional center’s purchase of services budget shall not be used for this purchase.

(b) Consultation pursuant to subdivision (a) shall occur during the development of the proposal prior to the public hearing conducted in accordance with Section 4669.75 and after the completion of the public hearing.

(c) The regional center shall annually submit to the State Department of Developmental Services a report on the implementation of the service delivery options approved by the department under this section. The report shall review the effects of the proposal, if applicable, upon the regional center purchase of service budget and the state budget, the impact on other regional center services, and the impact on consumers served under the proposal. This report shall be completed within 90 days of the end of each fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 409, Sec. 51.   (AB 1595)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4669.75.

(a) Any proposal approved by the department pursuant to this article may be implemented immediately upon approval. Prior to submitting a proposal to the department, the regional center shall conduct a public hearing to receive comments on the proposal. Notice of the public hearing shall be given at least 10 business days in advance of the hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance with this section.

(b) Notice shall include a summary of the proposal, analysis of the effect of the proposal upon the regional center budget and the state budget, the impact on regional center services, and the impact on consumers served under the proposal, and a list of the statutes and regulations that will be waived under the proposal. No proposal approved under this article shall authorize a regional center to implement proposals that have not met all the requirements of this article. The department may not delegate its authority to review and approve proposals in accordance with this article.

(c) Each written comment submitted prior to the close of the final public hearing, and a summary of verbal testimony received, shall be considered by the regional center, and a summary of the responses to all comments shall be submitted as part of the proposal to the department. These comments and responses shall be made available, along with the proposal, for public review.

(d) A service delivery alternative shall be required to be implemented within the existing regional center funding allocation and shall be cost-effective to the state. No additional allocation shall be made to permit a regional center to implement a service delivery alternative. No proposal approved under this article shall authorize or give authority to a regional center to go forward with any other specific action or proposal that has not met all of the requirements of this article. The department may not delegate its authority to review and approve proposals in accordance with this article to a regional center or any other entity.

(e) Proposals approved by the department shall meet freedom of choice requirements pursuant to the assurances required in the home- and community-based services waiver under Section 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 235.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Development and Support of Community Facilities and Programs [4670. - 4698.53.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [4670. - 4670.]

4670.

The Legislature finds that there is a shortage of programs and facilities to provide a comprehensive network of habilitation services to persons with developmental disabilities throughout the state.

In order to assure the development and necessary support for a comprehensive network of programs of good quality, in every area of the state, in an orderly and economic manner, the following procedures are established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Planning and Developing New and Expanded Programs and Facilities [4675. - 4679.1.]

4675.

On and after January 1, 1978, the state plan established in this division shall be the primary method used for determining, in an orderly way, the programs and facilities that shall be developed, expanded, terminated, or reduced. The state plan shall also state the objectives of such programs, amounts and sources of required funding, priorities for development, timing, agencies responsible for implementation, and procedures for evaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4676.

Prior to making an appropriation or allocating any state or federal funds for new or major expansions of programs or facilities for persons with developmental disabilities, the state plan shall be reviewed to determine if the proposed expenditure is consistent with the priorities approved in the plan.

If any expenditure of such funds for new or major expansions of programs or facilities is proposed by any agency that does not conform to the priorities approved in the state plan, the state council shall review and publicly comment on such proposed expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4677.

(a) (1) The Developmental Disabilities Program Development Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury and hereinafter called the Program Development Fund. The purpose of the Program Development Fund shall be to provide resources needed to initiate new programs, and to expand or convert existing
 programs. Within the context of, and consistent with, approved priorities for program development in the state plan, program development funds shall promote integrated residential, work, instructional, social, civic, volunteer, and recreational services and supports that increase opportunities for self-determination and maximize independence of persons with developmental disabilities.

(2) An allocation from the Program Development Fund shall not be granted for more than 24 months.

(b) (1) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall, at least once every five years, request from all regional centers
 information on the types and amounts of services and supports needed, but currently unavailable.

(2) The state council shall work collaboratively with the department and the Association of Regional Center Agencies to develop standardized forms and protocols that shall be used by all regional centers and the state council in collecting and reporting this information. In addition to identifying services and supports that are needed, but currently unavailable, the forms and protocols shall also solicit input and suggestions on alternative and innovative service delivery models that would address consumer needs.

(3) In addition to the information provided pursuant to paragraph (2), the state council may utilize information from other sources, including, but not limited to, public hearings, quality assurance assessments conducted pursuant to Section 4571, regional center reports on
 alternative service delivery submitted to the department pursuant to Section 4669.2, and the annual report on self-directed services produced pursuant to Section 4685.7.

(4) The department shall provide additional information, as requested by the state council.

(5) Based on the information provided by the regional centers and other agencies, the state council shall develop an assessment of the need for new, expanded, or converted community services and supports, and make that assessment available to the public. The assessment shall include a discussion of the type and amount of services and supports necessary but currently unavailable including the impact on consumers with common characteristics, including, but not limited to, disability, specified geographic regions, age, and ethnicity, who face distinct challenges. The assessment shall highlight alternative and innovative
 service delivery models identified through their assessment process.

(6) This needs assessment shall be conducted at least once every five years and updated annually. The assessment shall be included in the state plan and shall be provided to the department and to the appropriate committees of the Legislature. The assessment and annual updates shall be made available to the public. The state council, in consultation with the department, shall make a recommendation to the Department of Finance as to the level of funding for program development to be included in the Governor’s Budget, based upon this needs assessment.

(c) In addition to General Fund appropriations, the Program Development Fund may be augmented by federal funds available to the state for program development purposes,
 when these funds are allotted to the Program Development Fund in the state plan. The Program Development Fund is available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department, and subject to allocations that may be made in the annual Budget Act. These funds shall not revert to the General Fund.

(d) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, and to the extent appropriated for this purpose in the annual Budget Act, the department may allocate funds from the Program Development Fund for the purpose of funding projects approved pursuant to former Section 4679, as that section read on June 30, 2026, and Section 4679.

(e) The deposit of federal moneys into the
 Program Development Fund shall not be construed as requiring the State Department of Developmental Services to comply with a definition of “developmental disabilities” and “services for persons with developmental disabilities” other than as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4512 for the purposes of determining eligibility for developmental services or for allocating
 state general funds deposited in the Program Development Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 6.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4678.

(a) The State Council on Developmental Disabilities, in implementing subdivision (b) of Section 4677, and with the support of the State Department of Developmental Services, shall convene a stakeholder workgroup on alternative and expanded options for nonresidential services and supports. The workgroup shall include persons with developmental disabilities, family members, providers, and other system stakeholders. The workgroup shall develop recommendations on how to best achieve all of the following:

(1) The development and expansion of community-based models that provide an array of nonresidential options, including, but not limited to, participation in integrated instructive, social, civic, volunteer, and recreational activities.

(2) The development and expansion of community-based work activities, including, but not limited to, customized employment development, integrated job training, and employer-provided job coaching.

(3) The expansion of work opportunities in the public sector.

(4) The increased utilization of existing models, including, but not limited to, self-directed services, vouchers, family teaching models, existing habilitation, and supported work vendors to facilitate access to nontraditional community-based nonresidential activities.

(5) Strategies to promote and duplicate successful and innovative models developed in California and in other states.

(6) The identification of, and strategies to address, statutory, regulatory, licensing, vendor-related, funding and other types of barriers to achieving the goals identified in this act, including strategies to improve individualization of services and supports by increased flexibility in design, staffing, and compensation.

(b) By May 1, 2007, the State Council on Developmental Disabilities shall submit recommendations from the workgroup to the Governor and appropriate committees of the Legislature and may, thereafter, incorporate subsequent recommendations into its state plan developed pursuant to Section 4561.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 397, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4679.

(a) In any year for which funding is available, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4418.25, to address the needs for services and supports of consumers living in the community, the department shall issue guidelines, including procedures and timelines, for the use of the available funds. These community resource development plan guidelines shall include requirements that community resource development plan funds be expended in accord with the principles of person-centered planning and that funded services be culturally and linguistically appropriate to the population served by the regional center.

(b) By December 31 of each year, the department shall engage stakeholders statewide, including soliciting input from the existing Lived Experience Advisory Group, to inform the development of the guidelines. Priorities for funding shall include, but need not be limited to, safety net services and supports that reduce reliance on the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center, institutions for mental disease, other restrictive settings in the community for which federal funding is not available, and out-of-state placement.

(c) The guidelines shall require regional centers to conduct outreach activities and seek input from stakeholders representing the diversity of the regional center’s catchment area, including, but not limited to, consumers, family members, providers, and advocates, to determine local needs and priorities for the use of community resource development plan funds. Each regional center shall identify the
 stakeholders it consulted with and include information on how it incorporated the input of stakeholders into its community resource development plan funding requests. The regional center shall post its priorities for community resource development as informed by the stakeholder process on its internet website at least two weeks prior to submitting its funding request to the department to allow for any final stakeholder input.

(d) Proposals for the use of community resource development plan funds shall include justification for the funding requests, including quantitative data, and shall also include a description of how the regional center shall monitor resource development and assess outcomes. The department shall review, negotiate, and
 approve regional center community resource development plans for feasibility.

(e) Each regional center’s approved proposals shall be posted on the regional center’s internet website and the department shall post links to each regional center’s approved proposals on its internet website.
 Regional centers shall submit quarterly reports to the department, as specified in the guidelines, on the use of community resource development plan funds and outcomes of resource development. The department shall update legislative staff on the community resource development plan activities pursuant to this section during regularly scheduled quarterly briefings, and shall annually report during the Senate and Assembly budget subcommittee hearing process on community resource development plan implementation.

(f) This section shall become inoperative on October 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 7.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Inoperative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 8 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 253.)
-------------------------------------------

4679.

(a) In any year for which funding is available, to address the needs for services and supports of individuals living in the community, the department shall issue guidelines, including procedures and timelines, for the use of the available funds appropriated through the budget process for community resource development plans described in Section 4418.25. These guidelines shall include requirements that funds be expended in a manner consistent with the principles of person-centered planning and that funded services be culturally and linguistically appropriate to the population served by the regional center.

(b) Each year, the department shall engage with regional centers and community partners in a public meeting to inform the development of the
 guidelines. Priorities for funding shall include, but are not limited to, safety net services and supports that reduce reliance on the secure treatment program at Porterville Developmental Center, Canyon Springs Community Facility, institutions for mental disease, other restrictive settings in the community for which federal funding is not available, and out-of-state placements. Priorities for funding shall also include the development of community supports as determined by regional centers and community partners.

(c) Data from a centralized database that contains records of all authorized service providers across California’s 21 regional centers, referred to as the “Provider Directory,” shall be considered to inform the guidelines and the allocation and expenditure of community resource development plan funds for developing, expanding, or enhancing community-based services and supports.

(d) (1) Pursuant to the guidelines established under this section, regional centers shall develop community resources that address the priorities identified in subdivision (b) using funding allocated to each regional center by the department.

(2) Proposals for the use of community resource development plan funds shall include justifications for the funding requests, including quantitative data, and shall also include a description of how the regional center shall monitor resource development and assess outcomes. The department shall review, negotiate, and approve all regional center community resource development plans for feasibility and reasonableness.

(3) Regional centers shall report on the outcomes of approved plans to the department in a manner and format to be determined by the department.

(4) The department shall hold regional centers accountable for the development and implementation of approved plans. The department shall make the following data for each regional center available upon request:

(A) Data regarding admissions to, and placements from, each state-operated facility or program.

(B) Aggregate performance data.

(e) (1) The department shall post a list, including descriptions, of projects for which it has allocated funding pursuant to this section on its internet website.

(2) Each regional center shall post its department-approved plan on its internet website.

(3) Regional centers
 shall report quarterly to the department on the progress of each project.

(f) This section shall become operative on October 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 8.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4679.1.

Commencing January 1, 2027, the department shall provide to the Senate Committee on Human Services, the Assembly Committee on Human Services, and the appropriate legislative budget subcommittees on
 all of the following information, appropriately deidentified to protect the privacy of individuals, as part of the department’s quarterly legislative update:

(a) The type and number of housing projects approved, in progress, and occupied, and the total number of allowable beds, by regional center.

(b) The total number of new beds by facility type, by regional center.

(c) To the extent data is available, the degree to which housing development gains have been offset by program closures, by facility type, for each regional center.

(d) Statewide aggregate data on all of the following:

(1) The number of individuals placed in a home with delayed egress and secure perimeters pursuant to Section 1267.75 or 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The length of stay for individuals in a home with delayed egress and secure perimeters pursuant to Section 1267.75 or 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The number of individuals who transitioned out of a home with delayed egress and secure perimeters pursuant to Section 1267.75 or 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code in the last 12 months.

(e) Progress in reducing reliance on mental health facilities ineligible for Medicaid funding, institutions for mental disease, and out-of-state placements, including information,
 appropriately deidentified to protect the privacy of individuals, on the utilization of those facilities, which shall include, by regional center, all of the following information for these facilities:

(1) The total number and the age, race, and ethnicity of individuals placed in those facilities.

(2) The number of admissions.

(3) The reasons for admissions by category, including, but not limited to, incompetent-to-stand-trial commitments, commitments made pursuant to Section 6500, crisis stabilization, and lack of appropriate community placement.

(4) The lengths of stay of individuals.

(5) The types of facilities.

(6) The
 funding source for placements.

(f) The use of and remaining balances of community resource development funds, by fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 9.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rates of Payment for Community Living Facilities [4680. - 4684.]

4680.

In order to assure the availability of a continuum of community living facilities of good quality for persons with developmental disabilities, and to ensure that persons placed out of home are in the most appropriate, least restrictive living arrangement, the department shall establish and maintain an equitable system of payment to providers of such services. The system of payment shall include provision for a rate to ensure that the provider can meet the special needs of persons with developmental disabilities and provide quality programs required by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 800, Sec. 1.   Effective August 29, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.1.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations that specify rates for community care facilities serving persons with developmental disabilities. The implementation of the regulations shall be contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose. These rates shall be calculated on the basis of a cost model designed by the department that ensures that aggregate facility payments support the provision of services to each person in accordance with his or her individual program plan and applicable program requirements. The cost model shall reflect cost elements that shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) “Basic living needs” include utilities, furnishings, food, supplies, incidental transportation, housekeeping, personal care
 items, and other items necessary to ensure a quality environment for persons with developmental disabilities. The amount identified for the basic living needs element of the rate shall be calculated as the average projected cost of these items in an economically and efficiently operated community care facility.

(2) “Direct care” includes salaries, wages, benefits, and other expenses necessary to supervise or support the person’s functioning in the areas of self-care and daily living skills, physical coordination mobility, and behavioral self-control, choice making, and integration. The amount identified for direct care shall be calculated as the average projected cost of providing the level of service required to meet each person’s functional needs in an economically and efficiently operated community care facility. The direct care portion of the rate shall reflect specific service levels defined by the department on the basis of relative
 resident need and the individual program plan.

(3) “Special services” include specialized training, treatment, supervision, or other services that a person’s individual program plan requires to be provided by the residential facility in addition to the direct care provided under paragraph (2). The amount identified for special services shall be calculated for each individual based on the additional services specified in the person’s individual program plan and the prevailing rates paid for similar services in the area. The special services portion of the rate shall reflect a negotiated agreement between the facility and the regional center in accordance with Section 4648.

(4) “Indirect costs” include managerial personnel, facility operation, maintenance and repair, other nondirect care, employee benefits, contracts, training, travel, licenses, taxes, interest, insurance,